Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 2

Adoption of Charter

6-1-201. Right to adopt charter — Incorporation within specified distances from existing cities.

The residents of any incorporated municipality or of any territory wanting to incorporate under this charter may adopt chapters 1-4 of this title in the manner provided in this chapter. Thereupon, the municipality or territory shall be and become incorporated and be governed as set forth in this chapter. No unincorporated territory shall be incorporated under this charter unless such territory contains not fewer than one thousand five hundred (1,500) persons, who shall be actual residents of the territory.

No unincorporated territory shall be allowed to hold a referendum on the question of whether or not to incorporate under this charter until a plan of services is documented, setting forth the identification and projected timing of municipal services proposed to be provided and the revenue from purely local sources to be payable annually. The plan of services shall be attached to the petition to incorporate when such petition is filed with the county election commission. The plan of services shall include, but not be limited to, police protection, fire protection, water service, sanitary sewage system, solid waste disposal, road and street construction and repair, recreational facilities, a proposed five-year operational budget, including projected revenues and expenditures, and the revenue from purely local sources to be payable annually. Municipalities that are first incorporated on or after July 1, 1993, and that produce no local own-source revenues in any fiscal year, shall not receive any state-shared revenues during the next fiscal year.

Prior to filing the petition with the county election commission, a public hearing on the referendum on the question of whether or not to incorporate under this charter and plan of services shall be conducted. The public hearing shall be advertised in a newspaper of general circulation for two (2) consecutive weeks.

Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2), no unincorporated territory shall be incorporated within three (3) miles of an existing municipality or within five (5) miles of an existing municipality of one hundred thousand (100,000) or more in population according to the latest census certified by the department of economic and community development. “Existing municipality” and “existing municipality of one hundred thousand (100,000) or more in population” do not include any county with a metropolitan form of government with a population of one hundred thousand (100,000) or more, according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent census.

If any part of the unincorporated territory proposed for incorporation is within five (5) miles of an existing municipality of one hundred thousand (100,000) or more, according to the most recent federal census, and if the governing body of such municipality adopts a resolution by a two-thirds (2/3) vote indicating that the municipality has no desire to annex the territory, such territory may be included in a proposed new municipality. A petition for incorporation shall include a certified copy of such resolution from the affected municipality.

In any county having a population of more than eighteen thousand two hundred (18,200) and less than eighteen thousand five hundred (18,500), according to the latest census certified by the department of economic and community development, if any part of the unincorporated territory proposed for incorporation is within five (5) miles of an existing municipality of one hundred thousand (100,000) or more in population or within two (2) miles of an existing municipality of more than one thousand (1,000) and fewer than one hundred thousand (100,000) in population, according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent census, then action on the petition as provided in §§ 6-1-202 and 6-1-204 shall be held in abeyance for fifteen (15) months from the date of filing the petition. If, within this period, the existing municipality does not annex at least twenty percent (20%) of the land area or twenty percent (20%) of the population of the territory proposed for incorporation, then proceedings shall be continued as provided in §§ 6-1-202 and 6-1-204 as though the petition had been filed at the conclusion of the fifteen-month period. If the existing municipality annexes at least that part of the territory within this period, then the petition shall be null and void.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) or (b) to the contrary, a territory may be incorporated if the following conditions are fulfilled:

The territory contains two hundred twenty-five (225) residents or more;

The territory is composed of property that is one thousand six hundred feet (1,600') or more above sea level on the western border of the territory and contiguous with a county boundary on the eastern border of the territory;

The territory is located within an area that is bordered on the west, north and east by the Tennessee River and on the south by the border between Tennessee and another state; and

The territory is located within a metropolitan statistical area.

Notwithstanding subsections (a)-(c) to the contrary, a territory may be incorporated that meets the following conditions:

The territory contains three hundred (300) residents or more;

The territory's western boundary is contiguous with the western boundary of the county in which it is located;

The territory is located within an area bordered on the north by the Loosahatchie River and on the south by the Wolf River;

The territory's eastern boundary is approximately parallel with the western boundary, but in no place is more than eight (8) miles from the western boundary; and

The territory is located within a metropolitan statistical area.

Notwithstanding the requirements of this section, or §§ 6-1-202, 6-1-203, and 6-1-209, or any other law to the contrary, the petition for incorporation of the territory described in this subsection (e) may consist of a letter from a resident of the territory desiring to incorporate to the county election commission requesting that the question of incorporating the territory be placed on the ballot. The letter shall describe the exact boundaries of the proposed municipality, indicate the name of the proposed municipality, and indicate under which charter the territory desires to incorporate. The letter shall be treated as a petition meeting all the requirements of law.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, whenever the governing body of any existing city affected by this section, by a resolution adopted by a majority vote of its governing body, indicates that it has no interest in annexing the property to be incorporated, and when a certified copy of such resolution and a petition requesting that an incorporation election be held are filed with the county election commission, then the proceedings shall continue as provided in this chapter as though the proposed new incorporation was not within the specified distance of such existing city as provided in this section.

Subdivision (f)(1) applies in counties having a population of not less than eighty thousand (80,000) nor more than eighty-three thousand (83,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, and in counties having a population of not less than twenty-four thousand six hundred seventy-six (24,676) nor more than twenty-four thousand seven hundred (24,700), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census. An existing municipality located in an adjoining county may adopt a resolution in accordance with subdivision (f)(1) for purposes of authorizing incorporation under this subsection (f).

Nothing in this part affects an existing municipality's authority to annex unincorporated areas within the existing municipality's urban growth boundary.

Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1; 1993, ch. 320, §§ 1, 2; 1995, ch. 13, § 1; 1995, ch. 202, § 1; 1996, ch. 666, §§ 1, 4; 1996, ch. 708, §§ 1, 3; 1997, ch. 98, §§ 7-10; 1998, ch. 1101, § 27; 2018, ch. 760, §§ 1, 2.

Code Commission Notes.

The 1997 amendments to this section (enacted pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 98, §§ 7-11) were found unconstitutional by the Tennessee Supreme Court in Tennessee Municipal League v. Thompson, 958 S.W.2d 333 (Tenn. 1997). The provisions as set out above reflect the section as it appeared prior to the 1997 amendments and as amended by subsequent legislation.

Former § 6-1-201(d)(2), concerning the incorporation of the territory described in the present provisions of subsection (d) notwithstanding the provisions and restrictions in subsections (a) and (b), was deleted by the code commission in 2005.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 6-1-201 — 6-1-218 (Code 1858, §§ 1349, 1353, 4562; Acts 1875, ch. 92, §§ 1-7, 17; 1877, ch. 121, §§ 1, 3-9; 1899, ch. 307, § 2; Shan., §§ 1855, 1881-1896, 1900-1902, 6400; mod. Code 1932, §§ 3292-3307, 3311-3313, 10704; Acts 1951, ch. 166, § 1; modified; 1955, ch. 295, §§ 1, 2; 1957, ch. 346, § 1; 1959, ch. 295, §§ 1-6; 1970, ch. 426, §§ 1-6; 1971, ch. 260, § 1; 1974, ch. 776, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 6-101 — 6-116, 6-120, 6-121; Acts 1980, ch. 500, § 1; 1980, ch. 515, §§ 1-3; 1983, ch. 33, §§ 1, 2; 1984, ch. 743, § 1), concerning areas not already within municipalities, was repealed and replaced by Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1, effective July 1, 1991.

Acts 1993, ch. 320, § 9 provided that the amendments by that act shall have no effect on a petition for incorporation filed with the county election commissioner before July 1, 1993. It further provided that if litigation concerning the validity of a municipal charter is pending in either a trial or appellate court on July 1, 1993, then neither the amendments by that act nor title 6, chapter 51 shall be construed or applied in any manner that would prevent or restrict the territory described within such charter from once again incorporating as a municipality, should the court rule against the validity of the charter.

Acts 1995, ch. 13, § 15 provided:

“The change effected by Acts 1995, ch. 13, § 1, shall not apply to any locality for which a petition for incorporation was filed before March 17, 1995, for the purpose of allowing the incorporation election to go forward.”

For tables of population of Tennessee municipalities, and for U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment rewrote (f)(2) which read: “Subdivision (f)(1) shall only apply in counties having a population of not less than eighty thousand (80,000) nor more than eighty-three thousand (83,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census; provided, that in an adjoining county an existing municipality that is within the specified distance may also use the procedure authorized by subdivision (f)(1).”; and added (g).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 760, § 3. April 19, 2018.

Law Reviews.

Two Claims, Two Keys—Overcoming Tennessee's Dual-Majority Voting Mechanism to Facilitate Consolidation Between Memphis City and Shelby County (D. Eric Setterlund), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 933 (2011).

Attorney General Opinions. Restrictions on municipal incorporation: constitutionality, OAG 95-114, 1995 Tenn. AG LEXIS 127 (11/21/95).

6-1-202. Election to adopt charter.

The county election commission shall hold an election for the purpose of determining whether this charter shall become effective for any municipality or newly incorporating territory upon the petition in writing of at least thirty-three and one-third percent (331/3%) of the registered voters of the municipality or territory. The petition shall include a current list of the registered voters who live within the proposed territory. The petition shall state in a sufficient manner the boundaries of the proposed municipal corporation, which may be done by a general reference to the boundaries then existing if there is one. Upon receipt of the petition, the county election commission shall examine the petition to determine the validity of the signatures in accordance with § 2-1-107. The county election commission shall have a period of twenty (20) days to certify whether the petition has the sufficient number of signatures of registered voters. If the petition is sufficient to call for an election on the issue of incorporation, the county election commission shall hold an election, providing options to vote “FOR” or “AGAINST” the incorporation of the new charter, not less than forty-five (45) days nor more than sixty (60) days after the petition is certified. The date of the election shall be set in accordance with § 2-3-204. The county election commission shall, in addition to all other notices required by law, publish one (1) notice of the election in a newspaper of general circulation within the territory of the municipality or of the proposed municipality, and post the notice in at least three (3) places in the territory.

At any time not less than thirty (30) days prior to the election provided for in this part, the petition may be withdrawn or may be amended to call for a smaller territory for the proposed municipal corporation so long as all of the proposed smaller territory is contained within the boundaries of the territory described in the first petition. The withdrawal or amendment shall be valid if filed with the county election commission in writing, and if signed by not fewer than fifty-one percent (51%) of those who signed the original petition. In the event such an amended petition is filed, all provisions relating to time periods in § 6-1-201 shall be controlled by the date of the filing of the original petition, notwithstanding the filing of the amended petition, and the county election commission shall publish the notice of election as provided for in subsection (a). A petition to withdraw, when filed with and validated by the county election commission, shall render the original petition null and void.

A cash bond equivalent to the costs of the election to incorporate under this charter shall be filed by the petitioners with the county election commission together with the petition for incorporation.

Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1; 1997, ch. 98, § 4; 1998, ch. 1101, § 28.

Code Commission Notes.

The 1997 amendments to this section (enacted pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 98) were found unconstitutional by the Tennessee Supreme Court in Tennessee Municipal League v. Thompson, 958 S.W.2d 333 (Tenn. 1997). The provisions as set out above reflect the section as it appeared prior to the 1997 amendments and as amended by subsequent legislation.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 6-1-201 — 6-1-218 (Code 1858, §§ 1349, 1353, 4562; Acts 1875, ch. 92, §§ 1-7, 17; 1877, ch. 121, §§ 1, 3-9; 1899, ch. 307, § 2; Shan., §§ 1855, 1881-1896, 1900-1902, 6400; mod. Code 1932, §§ 3292-3307, 3311-3313, 10704; Acts 1951, ch. 166, § 1; modified; 1955, ch. 295, §§ 1, 2; 1957, ch. 346, § 1; 1959, ch. 295, §§ 1-6; 1970, ch. 426, §§ 1-6; 1971, ch. 260, § 1; 1974, ch. 776, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 6-101 — 6-116, 6-120, 6-121; Acts 1980, ch. 500, § 1; 1980, ch. 515, §§ 1-3; 1983, ch. 33, §§ 1, 2; 1984, ch. 743, § 1), concerning areas not already within municipalities, was repealed and replaced by Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1, effective July 1, 1991.

Attorney General Opinions. Incorporation by municipalities that held elections under voided Small Cities Act, 98-052 (3/2/98).

6-1-203. Petition to incorporate under this charter.

The petition filed in accordance with § 6-1-202 shall be in substantially the form provided in § 6-1-209 and shall include a description of the boundaries of the proposed municipal corporation and the boundaries of the proposed wards, if there is only one (1) alderman to be elected per ward, the wards that will carry the initial two-year term, the proposed name of the municipality and whether it is a city or town. The petition shall include a plan of services setting forth the identification and projected timing of municipal services proposed to be provided and the revenue from purely local sources to be payable annually. The plan of services shall include, but not be limited to, police protection, fire protection, water service, sanitary sewage system, solid waste disposal, road and street construction and repair, recreational facilities, a proposed five-year operational budget, including projected revenues and expenditures, and a property tax rate to be annually levied upon all taxable property in the area to be incorporated. Boundary descriptions shall contain references to tax maps kept in the office of the county assessor of property.

Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1; 1993, ch. 320, § 3; 1995, ch. 13, § 2; 2008, ch. 971, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 6-1-201 — 6-1-218 (Code 1858, §§ 1349, 1353, 4562; Acts 1875, ch. 92, §§ 1-7, 17; 1877, ch. 121, §§ 1, 3-9; 1899, ch. 307, § 2; Shan., §§ 1855, 1881-1896, 1900-1902, 6400; mod. Code 1932, §§ 3292-3307, 3311-3313, 10704; Acts 1951, ch. 166, § 1; modified; 1955, ch. 295, §§ 1, 2; 1957, ch. 346, § 1; 1959, ch. 295, §§ 1-6; 1970, ch. 426, §§ 1-6; 1971, ch. 260, § 1; 1974, ch. 776, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 6-101 — 6-116, 6-120, 6-121; Acts 1980, ch. 500, § 1; 1980, ch. 515, §§ 1-3; 1983, ch. 33, §§ 1, 2; 1984, ch. 743, § 1), concerning areas not already within municipalities, was repealed and replaced by Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1, effective July 1, 1991.

Acts 2008, ch. 971, § 1 provided that the code commission is directed to change all references to “tax assessor”, wherever such references appear, to “assessor of property”, as such sections are amended or volumes are replaced. See § 1-1-116.

Acts 1993, ch. 320, § 9 provided that the amendments by that act shall have no effect on a petition for incorporation filed with the county election commissioner before July 1, 1993. It further provided that if litigation concerning the validity of a municipal charter is pending in either a trial or appellate court on July 1, 1993, then neither the amendments by that act nor chapter 51 of this title shall be construed or applied in any manner that would prevent or restrict the territory described within such charter from once again incorporating as a municipality, should the court rule against the validity of the charter.

6-1-204. Qualifications to vote — Certification of result.

All registered voters of the municipality or of the territory of the proposed municipality are eligible to vote in the election.

The county election commission shall determine and declare the result of the election and shall certify the result in accordance with § 2-8-105(3) within forty-eight (48) hours after the election. It shall publish the results in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality or territory and, if the municipality is already incorporated, shall file the results with the legislative body of the municipality at its first meeting after the certification. The results shall be entered at large on the minutes of the body with which it is filed.

In any election held by municipalities incorporated under this charter, registered voters of the municipality may vote in accordance with this subsection (c). Upon adoption of a resolution approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the board of commissioners of any municipality incorporated under this charter that has a population of not less than seven thousand seven hundred ten (7,710) nor more than seven thousand seven hundred twenty (7,720), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, registered voters who own real property located in the municipality shall be entitled to vote in all municipal elections and municipal referenda held in the municipality. Section 2-2-107(a)(3) shall apply to the property rights voting within the municipality. The approval or nonapproval of the resolution shall be proclaimed by the presiding officer of the board and certified by the presiding officer to the secretary of state.

Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1; 2007, ch. 88, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 6-1-201 — 6-1-218 (Code 1858, §§ 1349, 1353, 4562; Acts 1875, ch. 92, §§ 1-7, 17; 1877, ch. 121, §§ 1, 3-9; 1899, ch. 307, § 2; Shan., §§ 1855, 1881-1896, 1900-1902, 6400; mod. Code 1932, §§ 3292-3307, 3311-3313, 10704; Acts 1951, ch. 166, § 1; modified; 1955, ch. 295, §§ 1, 2; 1957, ch. 346, § 1; 1959, ch. 295, §§ 1-6; 1970, ch. 426, §§ 1-6; 1971, ch. 260, § 1; 1974, ch. 776, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 6-101 — 6-116, 6-120, 6-121; Acts 1980, ch. 500, § 1; 1980, ch. 515, §§ 1-3; 1983, ch. 33, §§ 1, 2; 1984, ch. 743, § 1), concerning areas not already within municipalities, was repealed and replaced by Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1, effective July 1, 1991.

For table of populations of Tennessee municipalities see Volume 13 and its supplement.

6-1-205. Effect of vote.

If the majority of the votes cast are in favor of the adoption of this charter, it shall be deemed to have been adopted. The newly adopted charter shall not be effective until the first board takes office as provided in § 6-1-207. Except for the provisions of this charter that are adopted by reference in other municipal charters, the provisions of this charter apply only to those municipalities that have adopted this charter by referendum as authorized by law.

Following the defeat of an incorporation in an election held pursuant to § 6-1-202, no new petition for an election may be filed until after the expiration of four (4) years; provided, however, that if the territory included in the boundaries of the newly proposed municipal corporation includes less than fifty percent (50%) of the actual territory subject to incorporation in the previous election, the new petition may be filed after the expiration of two (2) years.

Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1; 1995, ch. 13, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 6-1-201 — 6-1-218 (Code 1858, §§ 1349, 1353, 4562; Acts 1875, ch. 92, §§ 1-7, 17; 1877, ch. 121, §§ 1, 3-9; 1899, ch. 307, § 2; Shan., §§ 1855, 1881-1896, 1900-1902, 6400; mod. Code 1932, §§ 3292-3307, 3311-3313, 10704; Acts 1951, ch. 166, § 1; modified; 1955, ch. 295, §§ 1, 2; 1957, ch. 346, § 1; 1959, ch. 295, §§ 1-6; 1970, ch. 426, §§ 1-6; 1971, ch. 260, § 1; 1974, ch. 776, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 6-101 — 6-116, 6-120, 6-121; Acts 1980, ch. 500, § 1; 1980, ch. 515, §§ 1-3; 1983, ch. 33, §§ 1, 2; 1984, ch. 743, § 1), concerning areas not already within municipalities, was repealed and replaced by Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1, effective July 1, 1991.

Attorney General Opinions. Effective date of city incorporation, OAG 99-089, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 89 (4/8/99).

6-1-206. Certification to secretary of state.

After certification of the election results, if at least a majority of the votes cast are “for charter,” the county election commission shall certify to the secretary of state that notice was duly given, and application in due form of law made, the description of boundaries, the entire number of votes cast, the number of votes cast “for charter,” the number of votes cast “against charter,” and the corporate name of the municipality.

Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 6-1-201 — 6-1-218 (Code 1858, §§ 1349, 1353, 4562; Acts 1875, ch. 92, §§ 1-7, 17; 1877, ch. 121, §§ 1, 3-9; 1899, ch. 307, § 2; Shan., §§ 1855, 1881-1896, 1900-1902, 6400; mod. Code 1932, §§ 3292-3307, 3311-3313, 10704; Acts 1951, ch. 166, § 1; modified; 1955, ch. 295, §§ 1, 2; 1957, ch. 346, § 1; 1959, ch. 295, §§ 1-6; 1970, ch. 426, §§ 1-6; 1971, ch. 260, § 1; 1974, ch. 776, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 6-101 — 6-116, 6-120, 6-121; Acts 1980, ch. 500, § 1; 1980, ch. 515, §§ 1-3; 1983, ch. 33, §§ 1, 2; 1984, ch. 743, § 1), concerning areas not already within municipalities, was repealed and replaced by Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1, effective July 1, 1991.

6-1-207. Election of officers upon incorporation — Length of terms.

The county election commission shall call an election not later than sixty-two (62) days following the election for adoption of this charter, at which time municipal officials shall be chosen who shall take office immediately following the election. The qualifying deadline for filing nominating petitions shall be as described in § 2-5-101.

In the election held pursuant to subsection (a), where there is more than one (1) alderman to be elected per ward, the alderman receiving the higher number of votes in each ward shall serve a four-year term. The alderman receiving the second higher number of votes shall serve an initial two-year term. All terms thereafter will be four (4) years.

The mayor and each alderman shall serve the term for which they were elected or until their successors are elected and qualified.

Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 6-1-201 — 6-1-218 (Code 1858, §§ 1349, 1353, 4562; Acts 1875, ch. 92, §§ 1-7, 17; 1877, ch. 121, §§ 1, 3-9; 1899, ch. 307, § 2; Shan., §§ 1855, 1881-1896, 1900-1902, 6400; mod. Code 1932, §§ 3292-3307, 3311-3313, 10704; Acts 1951, ch. 166, § 1; modified; 1955, ch. 295, §§ 1, 2; 1957, ch. 346, § 1; 1959, ch. 295, §§ 1-6; 1970, ch. 426, §§ 1-6; 1971, ch. 260, § 1; 1974, ch. 776, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 6-101 — 6-116, 6-120, 6-121; Acts 1980, ch. 500, § 1; 1980, ch. 515, §§ 1-3; 1983, ch. 33, §§ 1, 2; 1984, ch. 743, § 1), concerning areas not already within municipalities, was repealed and replaced by Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1, effective July 1, 1991.

Attorney General Opinions. Effective date of city incorporation, OAG 99-089, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 89 (4/8/99).

6-1-208. Succession to old corporation.

This charter shall take effect in any municipality immediately after the election and qualification of the first board of mayor and aldermen, and any then-existing charter of the municipality shall immediately become null and void.

The right, title and ownership of all property of the municipality and all of its uncollected taxes, dues, claims, judgments, and choses in action, and all of its rights of every kind whatsoever, shall immediately become vested in the new corporation chartered under chapters 1-4 of this title.

The new corporation shall answer and be liable for all debts, contracts and obligations of the corporation it succeeds in the same manner and proportion and to the same extent as the former corporation was liable under existing laws.

All ordinances, resolutions and bylaws duly enacted and in force under the preexisting charter and not inconsistent with this charter shall remain in full force until repealed, modified or amended.

Any zoning ordinance applicable to any territory incorporated under this charter shall continue to apply to that territory until the municipality enacts a zoning ordinance, or enacts an ordinance rescinding the zoning that applied to such territory.

Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 6-1-201 — 6-1-218 (Code 1858, §§ 1349, 1353, 4562; Acts 1875, ch. 92, §§ 1-7, 17; 1877, ch. 121, §§ 1, 3-9; 1899, ch. 307, § 2; Shan., §§ 1855, 1881-1896, 1900-1902, 6400; mod. Code 1932, §§ 3292-3307, 3311-3313, 10704; Acts 1951, ch. 166, § 1; modified; 1955, ch. 295, §§ 1, 2; 1957, ch. 346, § 1; 1959, ch. 295, §§ 1-6; 1970, ch. 426, §§ 1-6; 1971, ch. 260, § 1; 1974, ch. 776, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 6-101 — 6-116, 6-120, 6-121; Acts 1980, ch. 500, § 1; 1980, ch. 515, §§ 1-3; 1983, ch. 33, §§ 1, 2; 1984, ch. 743, § 1), concerning areas not already within municipalities, was repealed and replaced by Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1, effective July 1, 1991.

6-1-209. Sample petition for adoption.

Petitions for adoption of this charter shall be in substantially the following form:

PETITION FOR INCORPORATION ELECTION FOR TOWN (CITY) OF , TENNESSEE

TO: The County Election Commission, County, Tennessee

We the undersigned, being registered voters and residents of the territory herein proposed for incorporation, and being in number in excess of thirty-three and one-third percent (331/3%) of the registered voters of the herein described territory, hereby request the county election commission to hold an election on the question of whether or not the herein described territory shall be incorporated under the terms of Tennessee Code Annotated, title 6, chapters 1-4, and be known by the name and style of the “Town (City) of , Tennessee,” all as prescribed in Tennessee Code Annotated, title 6, chapters 1-4.

The territory in question, being part of the , Civil District(s) of County, Tennessee, is further described as:

(Here insert a description of boundaries with references to tax maps)

The wards of the Town (City) shall be as follows:

(Here insert a description of wards, and if there is only one (1) ward state that the boundaries are as described above)

Wards that will carry an initial two-year term:

(For those municipalities incorporating with more than four (4) wards.)

The proposed plan of services is as follows: (Here insert a description of the plan of services as defined in Tennessee Code Annotated, § 6-1-203).

PETITIONERS' SIGNATURES

Name Residence Address Date

(List name and residence as on registration records)

Certificate

I, , hereby certify that I personally solicited the signatures of the persons appearing on this page and that they, in fact, signed their names to this petition in my presence.

Name

Address

Date

STATE OF TENNESSEE COUNTY OF On this day of , 20 , before me personally appeared , to me known to be the person described in, and who executed, the foregoing instrument, and acknowledged that such person executed it as such person's free act and deed.

Signature and Seal of Notary Public

My commission expires:

Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1; 1993, ch. 320, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 6-1-201 — 6-1-218 (Code 1858, §§ 1349, 1353, 4562; Acts 1875, ch. 92, §§ 1-7, 17; 1877, ch. 121, §§ 1, 3-9; 1899, ch. 307, § 2; Shan., §§ 1855, 1881-1896, 1900-1902, 6400; mod. Code 1932, §§ 3292-3307, 3311-3313, 10704; Acts 1951, ch. 166, § 1; modified; 1955, ch. 295, §§ 1, 2; 1957, ch. 346, § 1; 1959, ch. 295, §§ 1-6; 1970, ch. 426, §§ 1-6; 1971, ch. 260, § 1; 1974, ch. 776, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 6-101 — 6-116, 6-120, 6-121; Acts 1980, ch. 500, § 1; 1980, ch. 515, §§ 1-3; 1983, ch. 33, §§ 1, 2; 1984, ch. 743, § 1), concerning areas not already within municipalities, was repealed and replaced by Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1, effective July 1, 1991.

Acts 1993, ch. 320, § 9 provided that the amendments by that act shall have no effect on a petition for incorporation filed with the county election commissioner before July 1, 1993. It further provided that if litigation concerning the validity of a municipal charter is pending in either a trial or appellate court on July 1, 1993, then neither the amendments by that act nor chapter 51 of this title shall be construed or applied in any manner that would prevent or restrict the territory described within such charter from once again incorporating as a municipality, should the court rule against the validity of the charter.

6-1-210. General validation provision.

The adoption, heretofore accomplished, of chapters 1 and 2 of this title, before June 30, 1991, by any territory or municipality is hereby ratified and validated in all respects. No flaw or defect or failure to comply with any technical requirement of incorporation shall invalidate any ordinance passed by any municipality incorporating under chapters 1-4 of this title, after June 30, 1991.

Notwithstanding this chapter or any other law to the contrary,

IF the registered voters of any unincorporated territory approved a mayor-aldermanic charter and elected municipal officials, acting pursuant to this chapter on or before December 31, 1999; AND

IF, from the election of such officials until April 26, 2001, the territory has continuously functioned as a mayor-aldermanic municipality; AND

IF the territory, between the date of such election and April 26, 2001, received and expended state funding allocated for municipalities; THEN

The adoption of such charter, the incorporation of such territory as a mayor-aldermanic municipality and the election of such officials are hereby ratified and validated in all respects; and no flaw or defect or failure to comply with any requirement of incorporation, set forth in § 6-1-201(b), shall invalidate the territory's status as an incorporated municipality or invalidate any ordinance passed by the board.

Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1; 2001, ch. 129, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 6-1-201 — 6-1-218 (Code 1858, §§ 1349, 1353, 4562; Acts 1875, ch. 92, §§ 1-7, 17; 1877, ch. 121, §§ 1, 3-9; 1899, ch. 307, § 2; Shan., §§ 1855, 1881-1896, 1900-1902, 6400; mod. Code 1932, §§ 3292-3307, 3311-3313, 10704; Acts 1951, ch. 166, § 1; modified; 1955, ch. 295, §§ 1, 2; 1957, ch. 346, § 1; 1959, ch. 295, §§ 1-6; 1970, ch. 426, §§ 1-6; 1971, ch. 260, § 1; 1974, ch. 776, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 6-101 — 6-116, 6-120, 6-121; Acts 1980, ch. 500, § 1; 1980, ch. 515, §§ 1-3; 1983, ch. 33, §§ 1, 2; 1984, ch. 743, § 1), concerning areas not already within municipalities, was repealed and replaced by Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1, effective July 1, 1991.

6-1-211. Elections valid despite informalities.

No informalities in conducting any election held under this chapter shall invalidate it if the election is conducted fairly and in substantial conformity with the requirements of this chapter and the general election law.

Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 6-1-201 — 6-1-218 (Code 1858, §§ 1349, 1353, 4562; Acts 1875, ch. 92, §§ 1-7, 17; 1877, ch. 121, §§ 1, 3-9; 1899, ch. 307, § 2; Shan., §§ 1855, 1881-1896, 1900-1902, 6400; mod. Code 1932, §§ 3292-3307, 3311-3313, 10704; Acts 1951, ch. 166, § 1; modified; 1955, ch. 295, §§ 1, 2; 1957, ch. 346, § 1; 1959, ch. 295, §§ 1-6; 1970, ch. 426, §§ 1-6; 1971, ch. 260, § 1; 1974, ch. 776, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 6-101 — 6-116, 6-120, 6-121; Acts 1980, ch. 500, § 1; 1980, ch. 515, §§ 1-3; 1983, ch. 33, §§ 1, 2; 1984, ch. 743, § 1), concerning areas not already within municipalities, was repealed and replaced by Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1, effective July 1, 1991.

6-1-212 — 6-1-218. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 6-1-201 — 6-1-218 (Code 1858, §§ 1349, 1353, 4562; Acts 1875, ch. 92, §§ 1-7, 17; 1877, ch. 121, §§ 1, 3-9; 1899, ch. 307, § 2; Shan., §§ 1855, 1881-1896, 1900-1902, 6400; mod. Code 1932, §§ 3292-3307, 3311-3313, 10704; Acts 1951, ch. 166, § 1; modified; 1955, ch. 295, §§ 1, 2; 1957, ch. 346, § 1; 1959, ch. 295, §§ 1-6; 1970, ch. 426, §§ 1-6; 1971, ch. 260, § 1; 1974, ch. 776, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 6-101 — 6-116, 6-120, 6-121; Acts 1980, ch. 500, § 1; 1980, ch. 515, §§ 1-3; 1983, ch. 33, §§ 1, 2; 1984, ch. 743, § 1), concerning areas not already within municipalities, was repealed and replaced by Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1, effective July 1, 1991.

6-1-219. [Unconstitutional.]

Code Commission Notes.

This section (enacted pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 98) was found unconstitutional by the Tennessee Supreme Court in Tennessee Municipal League v. Thompson, 958 S.W.2d 333 (Tenn. 1997) and has been deleted by the code commission.

6-1-220. County of situs to continue receiving tax revenues from new municipality until July 1 — Exception — Notice to department.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, whenever a new municipality incorporates under any form of charter, the county or counties in which the new municipality is located shall continue to receive the revenue from all state and local taxes distributed on the basis of situs of collection, generated within the newly incorporated area, until July 1 following the incorporation, unless the incorporation takes effect on July 1.

If the incorporation takes effect on July 1, then the municipality shall begin receiving revenue from such taxes generated within its corporate boundaries for the period beginning July 1.

Whenever a municipality incorporates, the municipality shall notify the department of revenue of such incorporation prior to the incorporation becoming effective for the purpose of tax administration.

Such taxes shall include the local sales tax authorized in § 67-6-103, the income tax on dividends authorized in § 67-2-102, and all other such taxes distributed to counties and municipalities based on the situs of their collection.

Acts 1998, ch. 651, § 1.